sl-SI: Arhitektura nabora ukazov: 32-bitni; 64-bit; Drugo
sk-SK: Architektúra inštruktážneho súboru: 32-bitový; 64-bitový; Iné
lt-LT: Instrukcijų rinkinio architektūra: 32 bitai; 64 bitai; Kita
hu: Utasításkészlet architektúrája: 32 bites; 64 bites; Egyéb
zh-TW: 指令集架構: 32 位元; 64 位元; 其他
vi: Kiến trúc tập lệnh: 32 bit; 64 bit; Khác
el: Αρχιτεκτονική συνόλου εντολών: 32-bit; 64-bit; Άλλο
fr: Architecture de l’ensemble des instructions: 32 bits; 64 bits; Autre
es: Arquitectura del conjunto de instrucciones: 32 bits; 64 bits; Otros
nb: Instruksjonssettarkitektur: 32-bit; 64-bit; Annet
de: Befehlssatzarchitektur: 32-Bit; 64-Bit; Sonstiges
ru: Архитектура набора команд: 32-битный; 64-битный; Другой
th: สถาปัตยกรรมชุดคำสั่ง: 32-bit; 64-bit; อื่นๆ
ja: 命令セットアーキテクチャ: 32ビット; 64ビット; その他
pt-PT: Arquitetura do conjunto de instruções: 32-bit; 64-bit; Outro
bg-BG: Архитектура на набора от инструкции: 32-битов; 64-битов; Други
cs: Architektura instrukční sady: 32bitová; 64bitová; Jiné
nl: Instructiesetarchitectuur: 32-bits; 64-bits; Andere
fi: Ohjesarjan arkkitehtuuri: 32-bittinen; 64-bittinen; Muu
ro-RO: Arhitectură set instrucțiuni: 32 de biți; 64 de biți; Altele
tr: Komut Seti Mimarisi: 32 bit; 64 bit; Diğer
hr-HR: Arhitektura skupa naredbi: 32-bitni; 64-bitni; Ostalo
zh-CN: 指令集架构: 32 位; 64 位; 其他
da: Instruktionssætarkitektur: 32-bit; 64-bit; Andet
ko: 명령 세트 아키텍처: 32비트; 64비트; 기타
sv: Instruktionsarkitektur: 32-bitars; 64-bitars; Övrigt
pt-BR: Arquitetura do conjunto de instruções: 32 bits; 64 bits; Outro
en: Instruction set architecture: 32-bit; 64-bit; Other
pl: Architektura zestawu instrukcji: 32-bitowy; 64-bitowy; Inne
it: Instruction Set Architecture: 32-bit; 64-bit; Altro